Hawaii statutes.
[§168-8] Rules. The board of
agriculture may perform any and all acts and make such rules as may be
necessary and proper for the purpose of carrying out this chapter, which upon
compliance with chapter 91 shall have the force and effect of law. [L 1987, c
306, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next